Nevada, session 83, AB333.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 551 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 and 4 of this
act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Department” means the State Department of
Agriculture.
Sec. 4. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
Sec. 5. 1. The Director shall establish a state fairground, to
be known as the Nevada State Fairgrounds.
2. The Department shall:
(a) Develop, maintain, operate and promote the use of the
Nevada State Fairgrounds and any facilities located thereon; and
(b) Promote purposes relating to agriculture using the Nevada
State Fairgrounds.
3. To carry out the requirements of this section, the Director
may:
(a) Enter into contracts or other legal agreements with the
Federal Government, state officials, state agencies, local
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
governments, quasi-governmental entities, nonprofit organizations
and for-profit businesses; and
(b) Rent or lease concessions located within the boundaries of
the Nevada State Fairgrounds to any public or private person for
valuable consideration under such terms and conditions deemed
fit and proper by the Director.
Sec. 6. 1. The Account for the Maintenance and Operation
of the Nevada State Fairgrounds is hereby created in the State
General Fund. The Director shall administer the Account. The
Account is a continuing account without reversion.
2. Money in the Account must be used by the Department to
develop, maintain, operate and promote the use of the Nevada
State Fairgrounds and any facilities located thereon.
3. The Director may accept gifts, grants, donations and
bequests of money from any source. The money must be deposited
in the State Treasury for credit to the Account.
4. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account.
Sec. 7. NRS 551.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
551.030 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 547.110,
the [State] Department [of Agriculture] may operate or authorize the
operation of any state fair or regional fair in this State.
2. The Director [of the Department] must determine the venue
and frequency of any state fair or regional fair, except that a state
fair or regional fair may not be held more frequently than once each
calendar year.
Sec. 8. NRS 563.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
563.080 1. The Board shall have possession and care of all
property of the Nevada Junior Livestock Show and the Nevada
Youth Livestock and Dairy Show and shall be entrusted with the
direction of the entire business and financial affairs of these
exhibitions.
2. The Board may:
(a) Appoint employees and define their duties.
(b) Adopt bylaws, rules and regulations for the government of
the Nevada Junior Livestock Show Board, the Nevada Junior
Livestock Show and the Nevada Youth Livestock and Dairy Show
and for all exhibitions of livestock.
(c) Acquire or lease real and personal property, buildings and
improvements.
3. The Board shall review [:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(a) All uses of the real property leased to Washoe County for
use as a fairground; and
(b) Any] any physical improvements or changes to the [facilities
at the fairground,
] Nevada State Fairgrounds established pursuant to section 5 of
this act to ensure that the [use of] improvements or changes to the
property [for purposes related to agriculture and livestock continues]
continue to comply with the provisions of the trust relating to the
fairground . [imposed upon the conveyance.]
Sec. 9. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
1. Pursuant to chapter 251, Statutes of Nevada 1951, the State
Board of Agriculture was directed to lease the real property
described as NE 1/4 SW 1/4 and SE 1/4 NW 1/4 of Section 1, T. 19
N., R. 19 E., M.D.B. & M., in Washoe County, Nevada
(approximately 80 acres less a described area of 2.904 acres) to
Washoe County for 50 years with the express provision that the
lessee “recognized the trust imposed by Chapter XXVII, Statutes of
Nevada 1887.”
2. Washoe County was directed to transfer not to exceed 6
acres of the southerly portion of the land originally leased to
Washoe County to the state board of military auditors pursuant to
chapter 11, Statutes of Nevada 1955.
3. The lease to Washoe County was extended to March 21,
2050, upon the same terms pursuant to chapter 295, Statutes of
Nevada 1971.
4. Pursuant to chapter 52, Statutes of Nevada 1977, a portion of
the real property leased to Washoe County was exempted from the
trust described in subsection 1 for the purpose of constructing and
maintaining a county public building complex. The real property is
described as follows:
All that real property situate in the City of Reno, County of
Washoe, State of Nevada, being all that portion of the Southwest
quarter of Section 1, Township 19 North, Range 19 East, M.D.B. &
M., described as follows:
Beginning at the Southeast corner of the Nevada National
Guard parcel as situated on the Washoe County Fairgrounds,
said point bearing South 44º33′52″ West 1,044.32 feet from a
Washoe County brass cup representing the Center of Section
1, Township 19 North, Range 19 East, M.D.B. & M.; thence
North 88º11′36″ West along the Southerly line of said
National Guard parcel 288.02 feet (Record 288.00 feet) to
Southwest Corner of said National Guard parcel; thence
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
North 1º48′24″ East along the West line of said National
Guard parcel 152.49 feet; thence North 88º16′06″ West
300.65 feet to a point on the Easterly line of Wells Avenue;
thence South 1º43′54″ West along the said Easterly line of
Wells Avenue 601.69 feet to the Northerly line of East Ninth
Street as shown on the Leete’s Syndicate Addition; thence
South 89º16′47″ East along said Northerly line of East Ninth
Street 1,272.65 feet to a point on the West line of Sutro Street
as described in Document No. 366638, at Book 895, page
509, filed for record on June 5, 1975, Official Records of
Washoe County, Nevada; thence North 0º33′14″ East along
said Westerly line of Sutro Street 324.45 feet; thence North
89º26′46″ West 100.00 feet; thence North 0º33′14″ East 70.00
feet; thence North 89º39′30″ West 366.93 feet; thence North
44º38′30″ West 262.89 feet; thence North 88º11′36″ West
18.60 feet to a point on the East line of said National Guard
parcel; thence South 1º48′24″ West along said East line
138.46 feet to the true point of beginning.
5. Pursuant to chapter 561, Statutes of Nevada 1997, a portion
of the real property leased to Washoe County was again exempted
from the trust described in subsection 1 for the purpose of
constructing and maintaining a county public building complex. The
real property is described as follows:
All that certain piece or parcel of land situate in the southwest
1/4 of section 1, township 19 north, range 19 east, M.D.M. and
being more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at the intersection of the east right-of-way line
of North Wells Avenue and the north right-of-way line of
East Ninth Street in the City of Reno, County of Washoe,
State of Nevada, said intersection being the point of
beginning; thence North 1°43′54″ East, 779.20 feet along the
east right-of-way line of said North Wells Avenue; thence
leaving said right-of-way and proceeding South 88°12′41″
east 669.35 feet to a point on the west right-of-way line of
Sutro Street; thence south 0°33′14″ west, 690.66 feet along
the west right-of-way of Sutro Street to the point of
intersection with the north right-of-way line of East Ninth
Street; thence along the north right-of-way line of East Ninth
Street, north 89°16′47″ west 1272.65 feet to the said point of
beginning and containing an area of 21.3 acres more or less.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
6. Pursuant to chapter 105, Statutes of Nevada 1999, the legal
description of the portion of the real property leased to Washoe
County described in subsection 5 was amended. The real property is
described as follows:
All that certain piece or parcel of land situate in the southwest
1/4 of section 1, township 19 north, range 19 east, M.D.M. and
being more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at the intersection of the east right-of-way line
of North Wells Avenue and the north right-of-way line of
East Ninth Street in the City of Reno, County of Washoe,
State of Nevada, said intersection being the point of
beginning; thence North 1°43′54″ East, 779.20 feet along the
east right-of-way line of said North Wells Avenue; thence
leaving said right-of-way and proceeding South 88°12′41″
East, 588.99 feet; thence South 1°48′24″ West, 65.00 feet;
thence south 88°12′41″ east 669.35 feet to a point on the west
right-of-way line of Sutro Street; thence south 0°33′14″ west,
690.66 feet along the west right-of-way of Sutro Street to the
point of intersection with the north right-of-way line of East
Ninth Street; thence along the north right-of-way line of East
Ninth Street, north 89°16′47″ west 1272.65 feet to the said
point of beginning and containing an area of 21.3 acres more
or less.
7. Washoe County has constructed and maintained a county
public building complex on a portion of the land described in
subsection 5, as amended by subsection 6.
8. The remaining portion of the real property not exempted
from the trust has strayed from the original trust purposes.
Sec. 10. The lease to Washoe County by the State Board of
Agriculture for the real property located in Washoe County, Nevada,
created pursuant to chapter 251, Statutes of Nevada 1951 and
extended pursuant to chapter 295, Statutes of Nevada 1971, is
hereby terminated.
Sec. 11. 1. The Administrator of the Division of State Lands
of the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, as
ex officio State Land Registrar, shall enter into an agreement with
Washoe County, whereby the real property upon which Washoe
County has constructed and maintained a county public building
complex shall be exempt from any trust imposed by the statutes
enumerated in section 9 of this act and shall be made immediately
available for use by Washoe County for the term of the existing
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
lease expiring on March 21, 2050, for the purpose of constructing
and maintaining thereon a county public building complex.
2. The agreement described in subsection 1 must:
(a) Require Washoe County to survey and generate a legal
description for the real property upon which Washoe County has
constructed and maintained a county public building complex.
(b) Provide that after Washoe County completes the
requirements of paragraph (a), the State Land Registrar shall
execute a new lease for no consideration with Washoe County for
the real property described in the legal description generated by
Washoe County pursuant to paragraph (a) and agreed to by the State
Land Registrar.
Sec. 12. Upon termination of the lease to Washoe County
pursuant to section 10 of this act:
1. The State Department of Agriculture shall be responsible for
the operation and maintenance of the portion of the real property not
leased to Washoe County, which shall herein be referred to as the
Nevada State Fairgrounds. The Director of the Department shall
establish the Nevada State Fairgrounds as required by section 5 of
this act.
2. The Director and the State Department of Agriculture shall
recognize the trust imposed by Chapter XXVII, Statutes of Nevada
1887, and shall manage, control and properly maintain the Nevada
State Fairgrounds subject to said trust.
3. Any money on hand or to become available to Washoe
County for the Nevada State Fairgrounds must be paid directly to
the State Department of Agriculture.
4. The State Department of Agriculture shall assume any
accounts payable by Washoe County for the Nevada State
Fairgrounds.
5. The State Department of Agriculture shall assume
responsibility for any existing contracts or other agreements entered
into by Washoe County for use of the Nevada State Fairgrounds or
any buildings or facilities thereon.
Sec. 13. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 14. Chapter 251, Statutes of Nevada 1951, at page 366,
chapter 11, Statutes of Nevada 1955, at page 13, chapter 295,
Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 526, chapter 52, Statutes of
Nevada 1977, at page 123 and chapter 561, Statutes of Nevada
1997, at page 2726 are hereby repealed.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 15. 1. This section and sections 11 and 13 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 10, inclusive, 12 and 14 of this act become
effective on the day that the agreement between the Administrator
of the Division of State Lands of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources and Washoe County that is
required pursuant to section 11 of this act takes effect.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)